North Carolina, session 2025, SB361.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:

PART I. TITLE
SECTION 1. This act shall be known and may be cited as the "Protecting First
Responders Act" or the "PROFR Act."

PART II. CRIMINALIZE EXPOSING CERTAIN EMERGENCY RESPONDERS TO
FENTANYL OR OTHER HARMFUL DRUG OR CHEMICAL AGENTS
SECTION 2.(a) G.S. 14-34.6(a) reads as rewritten:
"(a) A person is guilty of a Class I H felony if the person commits an assault or affray
causing physical injury on any of the following persons who are discharging or attempting to
discharge their official duties:
(1) An emergency medical technician or other emergency health care
provider.services personnel, as defined in G.S. 131E-155.
(2) A medical responder.member of a rescue squad or EMS service.
(3) Hospital employee, medical practice employee, licensed health care provider,
or individual under contract to provide services at a hospital or medical
practice.practice, or other emergency health care provider not otherwise
covered under subdivision (1) of this subsection.
…
(5) A firefighter.
(6) Hospital security personnel."
SECTION 2.(b) Article 36 of Chapter 14 of the General Statutes is amended by
adding a new section to read:
"§ 14-286.3. Exposing certain emergency responders to fentanyl or other harmful drug or
chemical agent; failure to notify certain emergency responders of presence of
fentanyl or other harmful drug or chemical agent.
(a) Definitions. – The following definitions apply in this section:
*S361-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(1) Emergency responder. – Any of the following persons who are discharging or
attempting to discharge their official duties:
a. An emergency medical services personnel, as defined in
G.S. 131E-155.
b. A member of a rescue squad or EMS service.
c. A firefighter.
d. A law enforcement officer.
(2) Expose. – Creating a risk of skin contact, inhalation, ingestion, or contact with
a needlestick or a mucus membrane, including the mouth, eyes, or nose.
(b) Exposure. – A person is guilty of a Class H felony if the person unlawfully and
intentionally possesses fentanyl or any other harmful drug or chemical agent and exposes an
emergency responder to the fentanyl or other harmful drug or chemical agent.
(c) Exposure Causing Serious Bodily Injury. – A person is guilty of a Class G felony if
the person violates subsection (b) of this section and the emergency responder suffers serious
bodily injury as a result of the exposure.
(d) Failure to Notify. – A person is guilty of a Class I felony if the person knows fentanyl
or other harmful drugs or chemical agents are unlawfully present at a location an emergency
responder is responding to and willfully fails to notify the emergency responder of the presence
of the fentanyl or other harmful drug or chemical agent within a reasonable time prior to the
emergency responder arriving at the location.
(e) Separate Offense. – Each violation of this section constitutes a separate offense and
shall not merge with any other offense."
SECTION 2.(c) This section becomes effective December 1, 2025, and applies to
offenses committed on or after that date.

PART III. APPROPRIATE FUNDS FOR EQUIPMENT TO PROTECT CERTAIN
FIRST RESPONDERS
SECTION 3.(a) There is appropriated from the General Fund to the North Carolina
Office of Emergency Medical Services (NCOEMS) the sum of ten million three hundred fifty
thousand dollars ($10,350,000) in nonrecurring funds for the 2025-2026 fiscal year to be
distributed as grants, upon application, to first responders for the following purposes:
(1) Eight million one hundred thousand dollars ($8,100,000) to be distributed for
the purchase of bulletproof vests for paramedics and emergency medical
technicians.
(2) Two million two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($2,250,000) to be distributed
for the purchase of bulletproof backpack plates for paramedics and emergency
medical technicians.
SECTION 3.(b) For purposes of this section, the term "first responders" means State
and local government agencies and nonprofit corporations providing EMS services through paid
or volunteer emergency medical responders, emergency medical technicians, advanced
emergency medical technicians, or paramedics who are registered with the NCOEMS.
SECTION 3.(c) Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the
funds appropriated by this section shall not revert until July 1, 2028.
SECTION 3.(d) This section becomes effective July 1, 2025.

PART IV. EFFECTIVE DATE
SECTION 4. Except as otherwise provided, this act is effective when it becomes
law.
Page 2 Senate Bill 361-First Edition